Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF73.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.013, subdivision 8, is amended to read: Subd. 8. Tax new text begin and fee new text end proceeds to highway user new text begin tax distribution new text end funddeleted text begin ; fee proceeds to driver and vehicle services operating accountdeleted text end . (a) Unless otherwise specified in this chapter, the net proceeds of the registration tax imposed under this chapter must be collected by the commissioner, paid into the state treasury, and credited to the highway user tax distribution fund. (b) All fees collected under this chapter, unless otherwise specified, must be deposited in the deleted text begin driver and vehicle services operating account under section 299A.705deleted text end new text begin highway user tax distribution fundnew text end . Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.017, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Registration period extension for leased vehicle. (a) Notwithstanding subdivisions 3 and 4, a person leasing for at least one year a vehicle registered under this section may obtain an extension of the motor vehicle's registration period for the unexpired portion of the lease period, for a period not to exceed 11 months beyond the expiration of the registration period. (b) In order to obtain an extension under this subdivision a lessee must: (1) apply to the registrar on a form the registrar prescribes; (2) submit to the registrar a copy of the lease; (3) pay an administrative fee of $5; and (4) pay a tax of 1/12 of the tax for the registration period being extended for each month of the extension. (c) On an applicant's compliance with paragraph (b) the registrar shall issue the applicant a license plate tab or sticker designating the new month of expiration of the registration. The extended registration expires on the tenth day of the month following the month designated on the tab or sticker. (d) All fees collected under paragraph (b), clause (3), deleted text begin must be deposited in the driver and vehicle services operating account under section 299A.705, subdivision 1.deleted text end new text begin and new text end taxes collected under paragraph (b), clause (4), must be deposited in the highway user tax distribution fund. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.021, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Fees; disposition. All fees collected from the sale of a disability plate or plates under this section must be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the deleted text begin driver and vehicle services operating account under section 299A.705, subdivision 1deleted text end new text begin highway user tax distribution fundnew text end . Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.10, subdivision 1i, is amended to read: Subd. 1i. Collector plate transfer. Notwithstanding section 168.12, subdivision 1, on payment of a transfer fee of $5, plates issued under this section may be transferred to another vehicle owned or jointly owned by the person to whom the special plates were issued or the plate may be assigned to another owner. In addition to the transfer fee a new owner must pay the $25 tax and any fee required by section 168.12, subdivision 2a. The $5 fee must be paid into the state treasury and credited to the deleted text begin driver and vehicle services operating account under section 299A.705, subdivision 1deleted text end new text begin highway user tax distribution fundnew text end . License plates issued under this section may not be transferred to a vehicle not eligible for the collector's vehicle license plates. Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.12, subdivision 2g, is amended to read: Subd. 2g. Retired firefighters; special plates. (a) The commissioner shall issue special retired firefighters plates to an applicant who: (1) is a retired member of a fire department as defined in section 299N.01, subdivision 2, has a letter from the fire chief affirming that the applicant is a retired firefighter who served ten or more years and separated in good standing, and is a registered owner of a passenger automobile, a one-ton pickup truck, a recreational vehicle, or a motorcycle; (2) pays a fee in the amount specified for special plates under subdivision 5, for each set of license plates applied for along with any other fees required by this chapter; and (3) complies with this chapter and rules governing registration of motor vehicles and licensing of drivers. (b) The commissioner shall design the special plate emblem so that it is distinguishable from the emblem on firefighter special plates issued under subdivision 2b. (c) On payment of a transfer fee of $5, plates issued under this subdivision may be transferred to another passenger automobile, one-ton pickup truck, recreational vehicle, or motorcycle registered to the individual to whom the special plates were issued. (d) Fees collected under this subdivision must be credited to the deleted text begin driver and vehicle services operating account under section 299A.705deleted text end new text begin highway user tax distribution fundnew text end . (e) This subdivision is exempt from section 168.1293. Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.1287, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Issuance of plates. The commissioner must issue blackout special license plates or a single motorcycle plate to an applicant who: (1) is a registered owner of a passenger automobile, noncommercial one-ton pickup truck, motorcycle, or recreational vehicle; (2) pays an additional fee in the amount specified for special plates under section 168.12, subdivision 5; (3) pays the registration tax as required under section 168.013; (4) pays the fees required under this chapter; (5) contributes a minimum of $30 annually to the deleted text begin driver and vehicle services operating accountdeleted text end new text begin highway user tax distribution fundnew text end ; and (6) complies with this chapter and rules governing registration of motor vehicles and licensing of drivers. Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.1287, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Contributions; account. Contributions collected under subdivision 1, clause (5), must be deposited in the deleted text begin driver and vehicle services operating account under section 299A.705deleted text end new text begin highway user tax distribution fundnew text end . Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.1293, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Deposit of fee; appropriation. The commissioner shall deposit the application fee under subdivision 2, paragraph (a), clause (3), in the deleted text begin driver and vehicle services operating account under section 299A.705. An amount sufficient to pay the department's cost in implementing and administering this section, including payment of refunds under subdivision 4, is appropriated to the commissioner from that accountdeleted text end new text begin highway user tax distribution fundnew text end . Sec. 9. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.1296, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Contribution and fees credited. Contributions under subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clause (5), must be paid to the commissioner and credited to the Minnesota critical habitat private sector matching account established in section 84.943. The fees collected under this section must be deposited in the deleted text begin driver and vehicle services operating account under section 299A.705deleted text end new text begin highway user tax distribution fundnew text end . Sec. 10. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.1298, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Contribution and fees credited. Contributions under subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clause (5), must be paid to the commissioner and credited to the Minnesota "Support Our Troops" account established in section 190.19. The fees collected under this section must be deposited in the deleted text begin driver and vehicle services operating account under section 299A.705deleted text end new text begin highway user tax distribution fundnew text end . Sec. 11. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.27, subdivision 11, is amended to read: Subd. 11. Dealers' licenses; location change notice; fee. (a) Application for a dealer's license or notification of a change of location of the place of business on a dealer's license must include a street address, not a post office box, and is subject to the commissioner's approval. (b) Upon the filing of an application for a dealer's license and the proper fee, unless the application on its face appears to be invalid, the commissioner shall grant a 90-day temporary license. During the 90-day period following issuance of the temporary license, the commissioner shall inspect the place of business site and insure compliance with this section and rules adopted under this section. (c) The commissioner may extend the temporary license 30 days to allow the temporarily licensed dealer to come into full compliance with this section and rules adopted under this section. (d) In no more than 180 days following issuance of the temporary license, the dealer license must either be granted or denied. (e) A license must be denied under the following conditions: (1) if within the previous ten years the applicant was enjoined due to a violation of section 325F.69 or convicted of violating section 325E.14, 325E.15, 325E.16, or 325F.69, or convicted under section 609.53 of receiving or selling stolen vehicles, or convicted of violating United States Code, title 49, sections 32701 to 32711 or pleaded guilty, entered a plea of nolo contendere or no contest, or has been found guilty in a court of competent jurisdiction of any charge of failure to pay state or federal income or sales taxes or felony charge of forgery, embezzlement, obtaining money under false pretenses, theft by swindle, extortion, conspiracy to defraud, or bribery; or (2) if the applicant has had a dealer license revoked within the previous ten years. (f) A license may be denied if a dealer is not in compliance with location requirements under subdivision 10 or has intentionally misrepresented any information on the dealer license application that would be grounds for suspension or revocation under subdivision 12. (g) If the application is approved, the commissioner shall license the applicant as a dealer for one year from the date the temporary license is granted and issue a certificate of license that must include a distinguishing number of identification of the dealer. The license must be displayed in a prominent place in the dealer's licensed place of business. (h) Each initial application for a license must be accompanied by a fee of $100 in addition to the annual fee. The annual fee is $150. The initial fees and annual fees must be paid into the state treasury and credited to the general fund except that $50 of each initial and annual fee must be paid into the deleted text begin driver and vehicle services operating account under section 299A.705deleted text end new text begin highway user tax distribution fundnew text end . Sec. 12. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.29, is amended to read: 168.29 REPLACEMENT PLATES. (a) In the event of the defacement, loss, or destruction of any number plates or validation stickers, the commissioner, upon receiving and filing a sworn statement of the vehicle owner, setting forth the circumstances of the defacement, loss, destruction, or theft of the number plates or validation stickers, together with any defaced plates or stickers and the payment of a fee calculated to cover the cost of replacement, must issue a new set of plates or stickers. (b) A licensed motor vehicle dealer may only apply for replacement plates upon application for a certificate of title in the name of a new owner or the dealer. The commissioner must issue a new set of plates or validation stickers upon application for title and registration after removal of plates pursuant to section 168A.11, subdivision 2. (c) Plates issued under this section are subject to section 168.12 (d) The commissioner must note on the commissioner's records the issue of new number plates and must attempt to cancel and call in the original plates so as to insure against their use on another motor vehicle. (e) Duplicate registration certificates plainly marked as duplicates may be issued in like cases upon the payment of a $1 fee. Fees collected under this section must be deposited in the deleted text begin driver and vehicle services operating account under section 299A.705, subdivision 1deleted text end new text begin highway user tax distribution fundnew text end . Sec. 13. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.326, is amended to read: 168.326 EXPEDITED DRIVER AND VEHICLE SERVICES; FEE. (a) When an applicant requests and pays an expedited service fee of $20, in addition to other specified and statutorily mandated fees and taxes, the commissioner shall expedite the processing of an application for a driver's license, driving instruction permit, Minnesota identification card, or vehicle title transaction. (b) A driver's license agent or deputy registrar may retain $10 of the expedited service fee for each expedited service request processed by the licensing agent or deputy registrar. (c) When expedited service is requested, materials must be mailed or delivered to the requester within three days of receipt of the expedited service fee excluding Saturdays, Sundays, or the holidays listed in section 645.44, subdivision 5. The requester shall comply with all relevant requirements of the requested document. (d) The commissioner may decline to accept an expedited service request if it is apparent at the time it is made that the request cannot be granted. (e) The expedited service fees collected under this section minus any portion retained by a licensing agent or deputy registrar under paragraph (b) must be paid into the deleted text begin driver and vehicle services operating account under section 299A.705deleted text end new text begin highway user tax distribution fundnew text end . Sec. 14. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.327, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Records and fees. (a) Upon request by any person authorized in this section, the commissioner or full-service provider must furnish a certified copy of any driver's license record, instruction permit record, Minnesota identification card record, vehicle registration record, vehicle title record, or accident record. (b) Except as provided in subdivisions 4, 5a, and 5b, and other than accident records governed under section 169.09, subdivision 13, the requester must pay a fee of $10 for each certified record specified in paragraph (a) or a fee of $9 for each record that is not certified. (c) Except as provided in subdivisions 4, 5a, and 5b, in addition to the record fee in paragraph (b), the fee for a copy of the history of any vehicle title not in electronic format is $1 for each page of the historical record. (d) Of the fee collected by the commissioner under paragraphs (b) and (c), 50 cents must be deposited in the general fund, and the remainder must be deposited in the deleted text begin driver and vehicle services operating account under section 299A.705deleted text end new text begin highway user tax distribution fundnew text end . (e) Of the fee collected by a full-service provider under paragraphs (b) and (c), the provider must transmit 50 cents of each fee to the commissioner for deposit in the general fund, and the provider must retain the remainder. (f) Except as provided in subdivisions 4, 5a, and 5b, the commissioner must permit a person to inquire into a record by the person's own electronic means for a fee of $4.50 for each inquiry, except that no fee may be charged when the requester is the subject of the data. Of the fee: (1) $2.70 must be deposited in the general fund; and (2) the remainder must be deposited in the deleted text begin driver and vehicle services operating account under section 299A.705deleted text end new text begin highway user tax distribution fundnew text end . (g) Fees and the deposit of the fees for accident records and reports are governed by section 169.09, subdivision 13. Sec. 15. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.327, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Driver records subscription service. (a) The commissioner may implement a driver records subscription service to provide information concerning access to driver license, instruction permit, and identification card records, including regular notice of records that have changed, to subscribers who: (1) pay applicable fees; and (2) are approved by the commissioner in accordance with sections 168.346 and 171.12, and United States Code, title 18, section 2721. (b) If a driver records subscription service is implemented, the commissioner shall establish a fee that does not exceed $3,680 per month for a subscription to the service. Fees collected under this paragraph must be credited to the deleted text begin driver and vehicle services operating account under section 299A.705, and are appropriated to the commissioner for the purposes in paragraph (a) and this paragraphdeleted text end new text begin highway user tax distribution fundnew text end . (c) If a driver records subscription service is implemented, the commissioner shall charge a fee of $0.02 per driver record requested. Of the fees collected under this paragraph, 20 percent must be credited to the deleted text begin driver and vehicle services operating account under section 299A.705 and is appropriated to the commissioner for the purposes in this subdivisiondeleted text end new text begin highway user tax distribution fundnew text end ; 30 percent must be credited to the data security account in the special revenue fund under section 3.9741, subdivision 5; and 50 percent must be credited to the driver and vehicle services technology account under section 299A.705. Sec. 16. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.327, subdivision 5a, is amended to read: Subd. 5a. Vehicle records subscription service. (a) The commissioner may implement a vehicle records subscription service to provide information concerning access to motor vehicle records, including regular notice of records that have changed, to subscribers who: (1) pay applicable fees; and (2) are approved by the commissioner in accordance with section 168.346 and United States Code, title 18, section 2721. (b) If a vehicle records subscription service is implemented, the commissioner must establish a fee that does not exceed $3,680 per month for a subscription to the service. Fees collected under this paragraph must be credited to the deleted text begin driver and vehicle services operating account under section 299A.705, subdivision 1, and are appropriated to the commissioner for the purposes in this paragraph and paragraph (a)deleted text end new text begin highway user tax distribution fundnew text end . (c) If a motor vehicle records subscription service is implemented, the commissioner must charge a fee of $0.02 per motor vehicle record requested. Of the fees collected, 20 percent must be credited to the deleted text begin driver and vehicle services operating account under section 299A.705, subdivision 1, and is appropriated to the commissioner for the purposes of this subdivisiondeleted text end new text begin highway user tax distribution fundnew text end ; 30 percent must be credited to the data security account in the special revenue fund under section 3.9741, subdivision 5; and 50 percent must be credited to the driver and vehicle services technology account under section 299A.705, subdivision 3. Sec. 17. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.327, subdivision 5b, is amended to read: Subd. 5b. Custom data request record fees. (a) For purposes of this subdivision, "custom data request records" means a total of 1,000 or more (1) vehicle title records, (2) vehicle registration records, or (3) driver's license records. (b) The commissioner must charge a fee of $0.02 per record for custom data request records. (c) Of the fees collected for custom data request records: (1) 20 percent must be credited to the deleted text begin driver and vehicle services operating account under section 299A.705, subdivision 1, and is appropriated to the commissioner for the purposes of this subdivisiondeleted text end new text begin highway user tax distribution fundnew text end ; (2) 30 percent must be credited to the data security account in the special revenue fund under section 3.9741, subdivision 5; and (3) 50 percent must be credited to the driver and vehicle services technology account under section 299A.705, subdivision 3. (d) The commissioner may impose an additional fee for technical staff to create a custom set of data under this subdivision. Sec. 18. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.33, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Filing fees; allocations. (a) In addition to all other statutory fees and taxes: (1) an $8 filing fee is imposed on every vehicle registration renewal, excluding pro rate transactions; and (2) a $12 filing fee is imposed on every other type of vehicle transaction, including motor carrier fuel licenses under sections 168D.05 and 168D.06, and pro rate transactions. (b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a): (1) a filing fee may not be charged for a document returned for a refund or for a correction of an error made by the Department of Public Safety, a dealer, or a deputy registrar; and (2) no filing fee or other fee may be charged for the permanent surrender of a title for a vehicle. (c) The filing fee must be shown as a separate item on all registration renewal notices sent out by the commissioner. (d) The statutory fees and taxes, the filing fees imposed under paragraph (a), and the surcharge imposed under paragraph (f) may be paid by credit card or debit card. The deputy registrar may collect a surcharge on the payment made under this paragraph not greater than the cost of processing a credit card or debit card transaction, in accordance with emergency rules established by the commissioner of public safety. The surcharge authorized by this paragraph must be used to pay the cost of processing credit and debit card transactions. (e) The fees collected under paragraph (a) by the department must be allocated as follows: (1) of the fees collected under paragraph (a), clause (1): (i) $6.50 must be deposited in the deleted text begin driver and vehicle services operating account under section 299A.705, subdivision 1deleted text end new text begin highway user tax distribution fundnew text end ; and (ii) $1.50 must be deposited in the driver and vehicle services technology account under section 299A.705, subdivision 3; and (2) of the fees collected under paragraph (a), clause (2): (i) $3.50 must be deposited in the general fund; (ii) $7 must be deposited in the deleted text begin driver and vehicle services operating account under section 299A.705, subdivision 1deleted text end new text begin highway user tax distribution fundnew text end ; and (iii) $1.50 must be deposited in the driver and vehicle services technology account under section 299A.705, subdivision 3. (f) In addition to all other statutory fees and taxes, a deputy registrar must assess a $1 surcharge on every transaction for which filing fees are collected under this subdivision. The surcharge authorized by this paragraph must be (1) deposited in the treasury of the place for which the deputy registrar is appointed, or (2) if the deputy registrar is not a public official, retained by the deputy registrar. For purposes of this paragraph, a deputy registrar does not include the commissioner. Sec. 19. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.381, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Specifications. The commissioner shall establish new or revised specifications for the material and equipment used in the manufacture of plates ordered for manufacture after August 1, 1975, and may from time to time revise the specifications; provided that the specifications conform to the requirements of section 168.12. In establishing new or revised specifications, the commissioner shall consult with and give consideration to the advice and recommendations of representatives of the Minnesota State Patrol, local police officers' associations, and the county sheriffs' association.new text begin Materials and equipment used in the manufacture of plates are subject only to the approval of the commissioner.new text end Sec. 20. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.62, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Special plates or certificate; fee; proceeds to highway user fund. At the same time that an owner or operator of intercity buses registers them in Minnesota and obtains number plates for the vehicle, the owner or operator shall apply for special identification plates or certificates for the remainder of that fleet of intercity buses. The registrar of motor vehicles shall design an appropriate plate or identification certificate for this purpose which must be issued upon the payment of a fee in the amount specified for special plates under section 168.12, subdivision 5, covering each intercity bus so identified. The proceeds of such fees shall be deposited to the credit of the deleted text begin driver and vehicle services operating account under section 299A.705, subdivision 1deleted text end new text begin highway user tax distribution fundnew text end . No intercity bus shall at any time be operated in the state of Minnesota without either Minnesota number plates or special identification plates or certificates issued as herein provided. Sec. 21. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168A.152, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Inspection fee; proceeds allocated. (a) A fee of $35 must be paid to the department before the department issues a certificate of title for a vehicle that has been inspected and for which a certificate of inspection has been issued pursuant to subdivision 1. The only additional fee that may be assessed for issuing the certificate of title is the filing fee imposed under section 168.33, subdivision 7. (b) Of the fee collected by the department under this subdivision, for conducting inspections under subdivision 1, $20 must be deposited in the general fund and the remainder of the fee collected must be deposited in the deleted text begin driver and vehicle services operating account under section 299A.705deleted text end new text begin highway user tax distribution fundnew text end . Sec. 22. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168A.29, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Amounts. (a) The department must be paid the following fees: (1) for filing an application for and the issuance of an original certificate of title, $8.25, of which $4.15 must be paid into the deleted text begin driver and vehicle services operating account under section 299A.705, subdivision 1deleted text end new text begin highway user tax distribution fundnew text end , and a surcharge of $2.25 must be added to the fee and credited to the driver and vehicle services technology account under section 299A.705, subdivision 3; (2) for each security interest when first noted upon a certificate of title, including the concurrent notation of any assignment thereof and its subsequent release or satisfaction, $2, except that no fee is due for a security interest filed by a public authority under section 168A.05, subdivision 8; (3) for each assignment of a security interest when first noted on a certificate of title, unless noted concurrently with the security interest, $1; and (4) for issuing a duplicate certificate of title, $7.25, of which $3.25 must be paid into the deleted text begin driver and vehicle services operating account under section 299A.705, subdivision 1deleted text end new text begin highway user tax distribution fundnew text end , and a surcharge of $2.25 must be added to the fee and credited to the driver and vehicle services technology account under section 299A.705, subdivision 3. (b) In addition to the fee required under paragraph (a), clause (1), the department must be paid $3.50. The additional $3.50 fee collected under this paragraph must be deposited in the special revenue fund and credited to the public safety motor vehicle account established in section 299A.70. Sec. 23. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168D.06, is amended to read: 168D.06 FUEL LICENSE FEES. License fees paid to the commissioner under the International Fuel Tax Agreement must be deposited in the deleted text begin driver and vehicle services operating account under section 299A.705deleted text end new text begin highway user tax distribution fundnew text end . The commissioner shall charge an annual fuel license fee of $15, an annual application filing fee of $13 for quarterly reporting of fuel tax, and a reinstatement fee of $100 to reinstate a revoked International Fuel Tax Agreement license. Sec. 24. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168D.07, is amended to read: 168D.07 FUEL DECAL FEE. The commissioner shall issue a decal or other identification to indicate compliance with the International Fuel Tax Agreement. The commissioner shall collect a fee for the decal or other identification in the amount established in section 168.12, subdivision 5. Decal or other identification fees paid to the commissioner under this section must be deposited in the deleted text begin driver and vehicle services operating account under section 299A.705deleted text end new text begin highway user tax distribution fundnew text end . Sec. 25. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.09, subdivision 13, is amended to read: Subd. 13. Reports confidential; evidence, fee, penalty, appropriation. (a) All reports and supplemental information required under this section must be for the use of the commissioner of public safety and other appropriate state, federal, county, and municipal governmental agencies for accident analysis purposes, except: (1) upon written request, the commissioner of public safety, a full-service provider as defined in section 171.01, subdivision 33a, or any law enforcement agency must disclose the report required under subdivision 8 to: (i) any individual involved in the accident, the representative of the individual's estate, or the surviving spouse, or one or more surviving next of kin, or a trustee appointed under section 573.02; (ii) any other person injured in person, property, or means of support, or who incurs other pecuniary loss by virtue of the accident; (iii) legal counsel of a person described in item (i) or (ii); (iv) a representative of the insurer of any person described in item (i) or (ii); or (v) a city or county attorney or an attorney representing the state in an implied consent action who is charged with the prosecution of a traffic or criminal offense that is the result of a traffic crash investigation conducted by law enforcement; (2) the commissioner of public safety may verify with insurance companies vehicle insurance information to enforce sections 65B.48, 169.792, 169.793, 169.796, and 169.797; (3) the commissioner of public safety must provide the commissioner of transportation the information obtained for each traffic accident involving a commercial motor vehicle, for purposes of administering commercial vehicle safety regulations; (4) upon specific request, the commissioner of public safety must provide the commissioner of transportation the information obtained regarding each traffic accident involving damage to identified state-owned infrastructure, for purposes of debt collection under section 161.20, subdivision 4; and (5) the commissioner of public safety may give to the United States Department of Transportation commercial vehicle accident information in connection with federal grant programs relating to safety. (b) Accident reports and data contained in the reports are not discoverable under any provision of law or rule of court. A report must not be used as evidence in any trial, civil or criminal, or any action for damages or criminal proceedings arising out of an accident. However, the commissioner of public safety must furnish, upon the demand of any person who has or claims to have made a report or upon demand of any court, a certificate showing that a specified accident report has or has not been made to the commissioner solely to prove compliance or failure to comply with the requirements that the report be made to the commissioner. (c) Nothing in this subdivision prevents any individual who has made a report under this section from providing information to any individuals involved in an accident or their representatives or from testifying in any trial, civil or criminal, arising out of an accident, as to facts within the individual's knowledge. It is intended by this subdivision to render privileged the reports required, but it is not intended to prohibit proof of the facts to which the reports relate. (d) Disclosing any information contained in any accident report, except as provided in this subdivision, section 13.82, subdivision 3 or 6, or other statutes, is a misdemeanor. (e) The commissioner of public safety or full-service provider as defined in section 171.01, subdivision 33a, must charge authorized persons as described in paragraph (a) a $5 fee for a copy of an accident report. Of the $5 fee collected by the commissioner under this paragraph, 90 percent must be deposited in the deleted text begin driver and vehicle services operating account under section 299A.705deleted text end new text begin highway user tax distribution fundnew text end and ten percent must be deposited in the general fund. Of the $5 fee collected by a full-service provider, the provider must transmit 50 cents to the commissioner for deposit in the general fund, and the provider must retain the remainder. The commissioner may also furnish an electronic copy of the database of accident records, which must not contain personal or private data on an individual, to private agencies as provided in paragraph (g), for not less than the cost of preparing the copies on a bulk basis as provided in section 13.03, subdivision 3. (f) The fees specified in paragraph (e) notwithstanding, the commissioner and law enforcement agencies must charge commercial users who request access to response or incident data relating to accidents a fee not to exceed 50 cents per record. "Commercial user" is a user who in one location requests access to data in more than five accident reports per month, unless the user establishes that access is not for a commercial purpose. Of the money collected by the commissioner under this paragraph, 90 percent must be deposited in the deleted text begin driver and vehicle services operating account under section 299A.705deleted text end new text begin highway user tax distribution fundnew text end and ten percent must be deposited in the general fund. (g) The fees in paragraphs (e) and (f) notwithstanding, the commissioner must provide an electronic copy of the accident records database to the public on a case-by-case basis using the cost-recovery charges provided for under section 13.03, subdivision 3. The database provided must not contain personal or private data on an individual. However, unless the accident records database includes the vehicle identification number, the commissioner must include the vehicle registration plate number if a private agency certifies and agrees that the agency: (1) is in the business of collecting accident and damage information on vehicles; (2) will use the vehicle registration plate number only for identifying vehicles that have been involved in accidents or damaged, to provide this information to persons seeking access to a vehicle's history and not for identifying individuals or for any other purpose; and (3) will be subject to the penalties and remedies under sections 13.08 and 13.09. Sec. 26. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169A.60, subdivision 16, is amended to read: Subd. 16. Fees credited. Fees collected from the sale or reinstatement of license plates under this section must be paid into the state treasury and credited one-half to the deleted text begin driver and vehicle services operating account under section 299A.705deleted text end new text begin highway user tax distribution fundnew text end and one-half to the general fund. Sec. 27. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 171.06, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Fees. (a) The fees for a license and Minnesota identification card are as follows: REAL ID Compliant or Noncompliant Classified Driver's License D-$27.75 C-$31.75 B-$38.75 A-$46.75 REAL ID Compliant or Noncompliant Classified Under-21 D.L. D-$27.75 C-$31.75 B-$38.75 A-$26.75 Enhanced Driver's License D-$42.75 C-$46.75 B-$53.75 A-$61.75 REAL ID Compliant or Noncompliant Instruction Permit $11.25 Enhanced Instruction Permit $26.25 Commercial Learner's Permit $8.50 REAL ID Compliant or Noncompliant Provisional License $14.25 Enhanced Provisional License $29.25 Duplicate REAL ID Compliant or Noncompliant License or duplicate REAL ID Compliant or Noncompliant identification card $12.75 Enhanced Duplicate License or enhanced duplicate identification card $27.75 REAL ID Compliant or Noncompliant Minnesota identification card or REAL ID Compliant or Noncompliant Under-21 Minnesota identification card, other than duplicate, except as otherwise provided in section 171.07, subdivisions 3 and 3a $17.25 Enhanced Minnesota identification card $32.25 (b) In addition to each fee required in paragraph (a), the commissioner must collect a surcharge of $2.25. Surcharges collected under this paragraph must be credited to the driver and vehicle services technology account under section 299A.705. (c) Notwithstanding paragraph (a), an individual who holds a provisional license and has a driving record free of (1) convictions for a violation of section 169A.20, 169A.33, 169A.35, sections 169A.50 to 169A.53, or section 171.177, (2) convictions for crash-related moving violations, and (3) convictions for moving violations that are not crash related, has a $3.50 credit toward the fee for any classified under-21 driver's license. "Moving violation" has the meaning given it in section 171.04, subdivision 1. (d) In addition to the driver's license fee required under paragraph (a), the commissioner must collect an additional $4 processing fee from each new applicant or individual renewing a license with a school bus endorsement to cover the costs for processing an applicant's initial and biennial physical examination certificate. The department must not charge these applicants any other fee to receive or renew the endorsement. (e) In addition to the fee required under paragraph (a), a driver's license agent may charge and retain a filing fee as provided under section 171.061, subdivision 4. (f) In addition to the fee required under paragraph (a), the commissioner must charge a filing fee at the same amount as a driver's license agent under section 171.061, subdivision 4. Revenue collected under this paragraph must be deposited in the deleted text begin driver and vehicle services operating account under section 299A.705deleted text end new text begin highway user tax distribution fundnew text end . (g) An application for a Minnesota identification card, instruction permit, provisional license, or driver's license, including an application for renewal, must contain a provision that allows the applicant to add to the fee under paragraph (a), a $2 donation for the purposes of public information and education on anatomical gifts under section 171.075. Sec. 28. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 171.07, subdivision 11, is amended to read: Subd. 11. Standby or temporary custodian. (a) Upon the written request of the applicant and upon payment of an additional fee of $4.25, the department shall issue a driver's license or Minnesota identification card bearing a symbol or other appropriate identifier indicating that the license holder has appointed an individual to serve as a standby or temporary custodian under chapter 257B. (b) The request must be accompanied by a copy of the designation executed under section 257B.04. (c) The department shall maintain a computerized records system of all individuals listed as standby or temporary custodians by driver's license and identification card applicants. This data must be released to appropriate law enforcement agencies under section 13.69. Upon a parent's request and payment of a fee of $4.25, the department shall revise its list of standby or temporary custodians to reflect a change in the appointment. (d) At the request of the license or cardholder, the department shall cancel the standby or temporary custodian indication without additional charge. However, this paragraph does not prohibit a fee that may be applicable for a duplicate or replacement license or card, renewal of a license, or other service applicable to a driver's license or identification card. (e) Notwithstanding sections 13.08, subdivision 1, and 13.69, the department and department employees are conclusively presumed to be acting in good faith when employees rely on statements made, in person or by telephone, by persons purporting to be law enforcement and subsequently release information described in paragraph (b). When acting in good faith, the department and department personnel are immune from civil liability and not subject to suit for damages resulting from the release of this information. (f) The department and its employees: (1) have no duty to inquire or otherwise determine whether a designation submitted under this subdivision is legally valid and enforceable; and (2) are immune from all civil liability and not subject to suit for damages resulting from a claim that the designation was not legally valid and enforceable. (g) Of the fees received by the department under this subdivision: (1) Up to $61,000 received must be deposited in the general fund. (2) All other fees must be deposited in the deleted text begin driver and vehicle services operating account under section 299A.705deleted text end new text begin highway user tax distribution fundnew text end . Sec. 29. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 171.13, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Examination fees. (a) A fee of $10 must be paid by an individual to take a third and any subsequent knowledge test administered by the department if the individual has failed two previous consecutive knowledge tests on the subject. (b) A fee of $20 must be paid by an individual to take a third and any subsequent skills or road test administered by the department if the individual has previously failed two consecutive skill or road tests in a specified class of motor vehicle. (c) A fee of $20 must be paid by an individual who fails to appear for a scheduled skills or road test or who cancels a skills or road test within 24 hours of the appointment time. (d) All fees received under this subdivision must be paid into the state treasury and credited to the deleted text begin driver and vehicle services operating account under section 299A.705deleted text end new text begin highway user tax distribution fundnew text end . Sec. 30. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 171.26, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. deleted text begin Driver and vehicle services operating accountdeleted text end new text begin Highway user tax distribution fundnew text end . Unless otherwise specified, all money received under this chapter must be deposited in the deleted text begin driver and vehicle services operating account under section 299A.705deleted text end new text begin highway user tax distribution fundnew text end . Sec. 31. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 171.29, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Reinstatement fees and surcharges allocated and appropriated. (a) An individual whose driver's license has been revoked by reason of one or more convictions, pleas of guilty, forfeitures of bail not vacated, or mandatory revocations under section 169.791, 169.792, 169.797, 171.17, or 171.172, and who is otherwise eligible for reinstatement must pay a single $30 fee before the driver's license is reinstated. An individual whose driver's license has been revoked under provisions specified in both this paragraph and paragraph (b) must pay the reinstatement fee as provided in paragraph (b). (b) A person whose driver's license has been revoked under section 169A.52, 169A.54, 171.177, 609.2112, 609.2113, or 609.2114, or Minnesota Statutes 2012, section 609.21, must pay a $250 fee plus a $430 surcharge for each instance of revocation before the driver's license is reinstated, except as provided in paragraph (f). The $250 fee must be credited as follows: (1) 20 percent to the deleted text begin driver and vehicle services operating account under section 299A.705deleted text end new text begin highway user tax distribution fundnew text end ; (2) 67 percent to the general fund; (3) eight percent to a separate account to be known as the Bureau of Criminal Apprehension account. Money in this account is annually appropriated to the commissioner of public safety and the appropriated amount must be apportioned 80 percent for laboratory costs and 20 percent for carrying out the provisions of section 299C.065; and (4) five percent to a separate account to be known as the vehicle forfeiture account, which is created in the special revenue fund. The money in the account is annually appropriated to the commissioner for costs of handling vehicle forfeitures. (c) The revenue from $50 of the surcharge must be credited to a separate account to be known as the traumatic brain injury and spinal cord injury account. The revenue from $50 of the surcharge on a reinstatement under paragraph (f) is credited from the first installment payment to the traumatic brain injury and spinal cord injury account. The money in the account is annually appropriated to the commissioner of health to be used as follows: 83 percent for contracts with a qualified community-based organization to provide information, resources, and support to assist persons with traumatic brain injury and their families to access services, and 17 percent to maintain the traumatic brain injury and spinal cord injury registry created in section 144.662. For the purposes of this paragraph, a "qualified community-based organization" is a private, not-for-profit organization of consumers of traumatic brain injury services and their family members. The organization must be registered with the United States Internal Revenue Service under section 501(c)(3) as a tax-exempt organization and must have as its purposes: (1) the promotion of public, family, survivor, and professional awareness of the incidence and consequences of traumatic brain injury; (2) the provision of a network of support for persons with traumatic brain injury, their families, and friends; (3) the development and support of programs and services to prevent traumatic brain injury; (4) the establishment of education programs for persons with traumatic brain injury; and (5) the empowerment of persons with traumatic brain injury through participation in its governance. A patient's name, identifying information, or identifiable medical data must not be disclosed to the organization without the informed voluntary written consent of the patient or patient's guardian or, if the patient is a minor, of the parent or guardian of the patient. (d) The remainder of the surcharge must be credited to a separate account to be known as the remote electronic alcohol-monitoring program account. The commissioner shall transfer the balance of this account to the commissioner of management and budget on a monthly basis for deposit in the general fund. (e) When these fees are collected by a driver's license agent, appointed under section 171.061, a filing fee is imposed in the amount specified under section 171.061, subdivision 4. The reinstatement fees, surcharge, and filing fee must be deposited in an approved depository as directed under section 171.061, subdivision 4. (f) A person whose driver's license has been revoked as provided in subdivision 1 under section 169A.52, 169A.54, or 171.177 may choose to pay 50 percent and an additional $25 of the total amount of the surcharge and 50 percent of the fee required under paragraph (b) to reinstate the person's driver's license, provided the person meets all other requirements of reinstatement. If a person chooses to pay 50 percent of the total and an additional $25, the driver's license must expire after two years. The person must pay an additional 50 percent less $25 of the total to extend the license for an additional two years, provided the person is otherwise still eligible for the license. After this final payment of the surcharge and fee, the license may be renewed on a standard schedule, as provided under section 171.27. A filing fee may be imposed for each installment payment. Revenue from the filing fee is credited to the deleted text begin driver and vehicle services operating account under section 299A.705 and is appropriated to the commissionerdeleted text end new text begin highway user tax distribution fundnew text end . (g) Any person making installment payments under paragraph (f), whose driver's license subsequently expires, or is canceled, revoked, or suspended before payment of 100 percent of the surcharge and fee, must pay the outstanding balance due for the initial reinstatement before the driver's license is subsequently reinstated. Upon payment of the outstanding balance due for the initial reinstatement, the person may pay any new surcharge and fee imposed under paragraph (b) in installment payments as provided under paragraph (f). Sec. 32. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 171.36, is amended to read: 171.36 LICENSE FEES; RENEWAL. All licenses expire one year from the date of issuance and may be renewed upon application to the commissioner. Each application for an original or renewal school license must be accompanied by a fee of $150 and each application for an original or renewal instructor's license must be accompanied by a fee of $50. The license fees collected under sections 171.33 to 171.41 must be paid into the deleted text begin driver and vehicle services operating account under section 299A.705deleted text end new text begin highway user tax distribution fundnew text end . A license fee must not be refunded in the event that the license is rejected or revoked. Sec. 33. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 190.19, subdivision 2a, is amended to read: Subd. 2a. Uses; veterans. (a) Money appropriated to the Department of Veterans Affairs from the Minnesota "Support Our Troops" account may be used for: (1) grants to veterans service organizations; (2) outreach to underserved veterans; (3) providing services and programs for veterans and their families; deleted text begin (4) transfers to the driver and vehicle services operating account for Gold Star license plates under section 168.1253; deleted text end deleted text begin (5)deleted text end new text begin (4)new text end grants of up to $100,000 to any organization approved by the commissioner of veterans affairs for the purpose of supporting and improving the lives of veterans and their families; deleted text begin (6)deleted text end new text begin (5)new text end grants to an eligible foundation; and deleted text begin (7)deleted text end new text begin (6)new text end the agency's uncompensated burial costs for eligible dependents to whom the commissioner grants a no-fee or reduced-fee burial in the state's veteran cemeteries pursuant to section 197.236, subdivision 9, paragraph (b). (b) For purposes of this subdivision, "eligible foundation" includes any organization that: (1) is a tax-exempt organization under section 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code; and (2) is a nonprofit corporation under chapter 317A and the organization's articles of incorporation specify that a purpose of the organization includes: (i) providing assistance to veterans and their families; or (ii) enhancing the lives of veterans and their families. Sec. 34. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 299A.705, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Driver and vehicle services technology account. (a) The driver and vehicle services technology account is created in the special revenue fund, consisting of the technology surcharge collected as specified in chapters 168, 168A, and 171; the filing fee revenue collected under section 168.33, subdivision 7; and any other money donated, allotted, transferred, or otherwise provided to the account. (b) Money in the account is annually appropriated to the commissioner of public safety for the development, deployment, and maintenance of the driver and vehicle services information systems.new text begin The commissioner is prohibited from expending money from this account for any purpose that is not specifically authorized in this subdivision.new text end (c) By January 15 of each year, the commissioner must submit a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over transportation policy and finance concerning the account, which must include information on (1) total revenue deposited in the driver and vehicle services technology account, with a breakdown by sources of funds; and (2) an estimate of ongoing system maintenance costs, including a breakdown of the amounts spent by category. Sec. 35. Laws 2023, chapter 68, article 1, section 4, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Driver and Vehicle Services (a) Driver Services 42,615,000 43,262,000 This appropriation is from the driver and vehicle services operating account under Minnesota Statutes, section 299A.705.new text begin The base for this appropriation is $0 in each of fiscal years 2026 and 2027.new text end $750,000 in fiscal year 2024 and $120,000 in fiscal year 2025 are for reimbursement to driver's license agents for the purchase and maintenance of equipment necessary for a full-service provider, as defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 171.01, subdivision 33a, following application to the commissioner. Of the amount in fiscal year 2024, the commissioner may provide no more than $15,000 to each driver's license agent. $115,000 in fiscal year 2024 and $109,000 in fiscal year 2025 are for staff costs to manage, review, and audit online driver education programs. $262,000 in fiscal year 2024 and $81,000 in fiscal year 2025 are for implementation of race and ethnicity information collection from applicants for drivers' licenses and identification cards. $58,000 in fiscal year 2024 is for the implementation costs of a watercraft operator's permit indicator on drivers' licenses and identification cards. $2,598,000 in each year is to maintain driver's license examination stations. The commissioner must keep open all driver's license examination stations that are open on the effective date of this section, including any stations that reopened following closure in 2020 due to the COVID-19 pandemic. (b) Vehicle Services 34,238,000 28,737,000 Appropriations by Fund 2024 2025 General 6,000,000 -0- Special Revenue 28,238,000 28,737,000 The appropriation from the special revenue fund is from the driver and vehicle services operating account under Minnesota Statutes, section 299A.705.new text begin The base for this appropriation is $0 in each of fiscal years 2026 and 2027.new text end $202,000 in fiscal year 2024 and $192,000 in fiscal year 2025 are for staff costs related to monitoring and auditing records issued by full-service providers. $6,000,000 in fiscal year 2024 is from the general fund for payments to deputy registrars. The commissioner must make payments to each deputy registrar based proportionally on the total number of transactions, excluding corrections and transactions at a self-service kiosk, completed by each deputy registrar during the previous fiscal year. The payments must be made on or before July 15, 2023. $1,600,000 in fiscal year 2024 and $1,300,000 in fiscal year 2025 are for staff and operating costs related to additional vehicle inspection sites. $101,000 in fiscal year 2024 and $96,000 in fiscal year 2025 are for an appeals process for information technology system data access revocations, including costs of staff and equipment. Sec. 36. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; DRIVER AND VEHICLE SERVICES ADMINISTRATION.new text end new text begin $95,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $95,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of public safety to administer driver and vehicle services, including the driver services specified in Minnesota Statutes, chapters 169A and 171, and the vehicle services specified in Minnesota Statutes, chapters 168, 168A, and 168D, and section 169.345. new text end Sec. 37. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, sections 168.1253, subdivision 6; 168.381, subdivision 4; 168A.31, subdivision 2; and 299A.705, subdivisions 1 and 4, new text end new text begin are repealed. new text end Sec. 38. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE.new text end new text begin Sections 1 to 34, 36, and 37 are effective July 1, 2025. Section 35 is effective the day following final enactment. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: 25-00662 168.1253 GOLD STAR LICENSE PLATE. Subd. 6. Costs of production. The commissioner of management and budget may transfer money in the "Support Our Troops" account under section 190.19, subdivision 2a, to the driver and vehicle services operating account under section 299A.705, subdivision 1, to pay for the cost of production of the license plates authorized under this section. The commissioner of veterans affairs and the commissioner of public safety must agree on a payment schedule before any money may be transferred under this subdivision. 168.381 MANUFACTURE OF VEHICLE PLATES; APPROPRIATIONS. Subd. 4. Appropriations. (a) Money appropriated to the Department of Public Safety to procure the plates for any fiscal year or years is available for allotment, encumbrance, and expenditure from and after the date of the enactment of the appropriation. Materials and equipment used in the manufacture of plates are subject only to the approval of the commissioner. (b) This section contemplates that money to be appropriated to the Department of Public Safety to carry out the terms and provisions of this section will be appropriated by the legislature from the highway user tax distribution fund. (c) A sum sufficient is appropriated annually from the driver and vehicle services operating account under section 299A.705 to the commissioner to pay the costs of purchasing, delivering, and mailing plates, registration stickers, and registration notices. 168A.31 DISPOSITION OF FEES; PAYMENT OF EXPENSES. Subd. 2. Expenses; appropriation. All necessary expenses incurred by the department for the administration of sections 168A.01 to 168A.31 must be paid from money in the driver and vehicle services operating account under section 299A.705, and such funds are hereby appropriated. 299A.705 DRIVER AND VEHICLE SERVICES ACCOUNTS. Subdivision 1. Driver and vehicle services operating account. (a) The driver and vehicle services operating account is created in the special revenue fund. The account consists of all money from the vehicle services fees specified in chapters 168, 168A, and 168D, all money collected under chapter 171, and any other money donated, allotted, transferred, or otherwise provided to the account. (b) Funds appropriated from the account must be used by the commissioner of public safety to administer: (1) the driver services specified in chapters 169A and 171, including the activities associated with producing and mailing drivers' licenses and identification cards and notices relating to issuance, renewal, or withdrawal of driving and identification card privileges for any fiscal year or years and for the testing and examination of drivers; and (2) the vehicle services specified in chapters 168, 168A, and 168D, and section 169.345, including: (i) designing, producing, issuing, and mailing vehicle registrations, plates, emblems, and titles; (ii) collecting title and registration taxes and fees; (iii) transferring vehicle registration plates and titles; (iv) maintaining vehicle records; (v) issuing disability certificates and plates; (vi) licensing vehicle dealers; (vii) appointing, monitoring, and auditing deputy registrars; and (viii) inspecting vehicles when required by law. (c) In conjunction with each forecast under section 16A.103, the submission of the governor's budget under section 16A.11, and the completion of a legislative session, the commissioner of management and budget must publish a supplemental statement for the account. The statement must include: (1) categorization of revenue and expenditures for recent, current, and upcoming fiscal years, with breakouts by anticipated expenditures under statutory and direct appropriations; (2) specification of the account balance actuals or estimates in each fiscal year; and (3) identification of changes in comparison to the most recent prior forecast. Subd. 4. Prohibited expenditures. The commissioner is prohibited from expending money from driver and vehicle services accounts created in the special revenue fund for any purpose that is not specifically authorized in this section or in the chapters specified in this section.